Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Cities of First Class

181.850.
Bridge commissions in cities of first class or consolidated local government. [Repealed.]

181.851.
Definitions for KRS 181.850 to 181.869. [Repealed.]

181.852.
General grant of powers. [Repealed.]

181.853.
Acquisition of property. [Repealed.]

181.854.
Bridge revenue bonds. [Repealed.]

181.855.
Trust agreement. [Repealed.]

181.856.
Revenues. [Repealed.]

181.857.
Trust funds. [Repealed.]

181.858.
Remedies of bond or coupon holders. [Repealed.]

181.859.
Bridge commission property and bonds exempt from taxation. [Repealed.]

181.860.
Bonds eligible for investment. [Repealed.]

181.861.
Maintenance of bridges. [Repealed.]

181.862.
Restoration of or compensation for private property damaged or destroyed. [Repealed.]

181.863.
Authority of counties, cities and other political subdivisions to lease, lend or sell property to commission. [Repealed.]

181.864.
Annual report and audit. [Repealed.]

181.865.
Commission officer or employee not to have interest in sale or purchase of bonds. [Repealed.]

181.866.
Bridge revenue refunding bonds. [Repealed.]

181.867.
Credit of city not pledged. [Repealed.]

181.868.
Reversion of existing bridges. [Repealed.]

181.869.
Provisions of KRS 181.850 to 181.869 deemed to prescribe alternative method of providing bridges. [Repealed.]